Nebraska, session 109, LB527A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $5,765,385 from the Medicaid
Access and Quality Fund and $12,279,638 from federal funds for FY2025-26 and
(2) $11,758,984 from the Medicaid Access and Quality Fund and $25,045,347 from
federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human Services, for
Program 344, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 527, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$5,765,385 Cash Funds and $12,279,638 federal funds for state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this
program for FY2026-27 $11,758,984 Cash Funds and $25,045,347 federal funds for
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $57,392,193 from the Medicaid
Access and Quality Fund and $105,013,007 from federal funds for FY2025-26 and
(2) $117,056,172 from the Medicaid Access and Quality Fund and $214,182,801
from federal funds for FY2026-27 to the Department of Health and Human
Services, for Program 348, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 527, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$57,392,193 Cash Funds and $105,013,007 federal funds for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to
this program for FY2026-27 $117,056,172 Cash Funds and $214,182,801 federal
funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-